Washington statutes.
RCW 17.28.360

Consolidation of districts—Initial proceedings.

Whenever in the judgment of the district board it is for the best interests of the district that it be consolidated with one or more other districts, it may, by a two-thirds vote of its members, adopt a resolution reciting that fact and declaring the advisability of such consolidation and the willingness of the board to consolidate. The resolution shall be sent to the board of each district with which consolidation is proposed.

The board of each district to which a proposal of consolidation is sent shall consider said proposal and give notice of its decision to the proposing board.

[ 1957 c 153 s 36.]